test/src/morphology/N-ritsjkas14_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ritśkas: # Noun (14) ritśkas 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Nom: ritśkas
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Gen: ritśka
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Par: [ritśkast, ritśkat]
     ritśkas+N+Sg+Ill: ritśkahe
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Gen: [ritśkidõ, ritśkastõ]
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Par: ritśkit
     ritśkas+N+Pl+Ill: [ritśkihe, ritśkastõhe]
     ritśkas+N+Pl+All: [ritśkilõ, ritśkastõlõ]
